Utah statutes.
23-19-34.5.   Falconry certificate of registration -- Residents 12 or older may obtain certificate of registration -- License for falconry meet for nonresidents -- Wildlife Board approval required for falconry meet -- Hunting license required to take protected game.

(1)  A resident 12 years of age or older, upon application to the division, may obtain a certificate of registration to hold falcons and engage in the sport of falconry on nongame wildlife species.

(2)  A nonresident entering Utah to participate in the sport of falconry at an organized meet shall obtain a license as provided in Section 23-19-34.7.

(3)  Organizers of a falconry meet shall apply to and receive approval from the Wildlife Board in order to conduct an organized falconry meet.

(4) (a)  Any person engaging in the sport of falconry on protected small game species shall possess, in addition to the falconry certificate of registration, a hunting license.

(b)  Any nonresident who has been issued a license pursuant to Section 23-19-34.7 is not required to possess a hunting license in order to take small game during the five-day period of the license.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2010 General Session

